Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 67. Mississippi Superconducting Super Collider Act
§ 57-67-17.
Powers and duties of public agencies and political subdivisions.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, design, undertaking and carrying out of the project or any facility related to the project, or any educational, cultural, housing or recreational facility or enhancement offered to secure the siting of the project in the state, any public agency or political subdivision of any kind is authorized and empowered upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine: (a) to enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, with the authority respecting action to be taken by such public agency or political subdivision with respect to the acquisition, planning, construction, improvement, operation, maintenance or funding of the project or any such facility or enhancement, including without limitation (i) the appropriation or payment of funds to the authority or to a trustee in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable the authority to defray any designated portion or percentage of the expenses of administering, planning, designing, constructing, acquiring, improving, operating, and maintaining the project or any such facility or enhancement, (ii) the appropriation or payment of funds to the authority or to a trustee to pay interest and principal (whether at maturity or upon sinking fund redemption) on bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter and to fund reserves for debt service, for operation and maintenance and for renewals and replacements, and to fulfill requirements of any covenant with respect to debt service contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to the bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter and (iii) the furnishing of other assistance in connection with the project or any such facility or enhancement; (b) to dedicate, sell, donate, convey or lease any property or interest in property to the authority or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to the authority; (c) to incur the entire expense of any public improvements made or to be made by such public agency or political subdivision in exercising the powers granted in this section; (d) to do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of the project or any such facility or enhancement; (e) to lend, grant or contribute funds to the authority; (f) to cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational areas, community meeting facilities, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished to or with respect to the project or any such facility or enhancement; (g) to furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, upgrade or improve highways, streets, roads, sidewalks, airports, railroads, ports or other public facilities; (h) to plan or replan, zone or rezone any parcel of land within the public agency or political subdivision or make exceptions from land use, building and zoning regulations; and (i) to cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the authority, including services pertaining to the acquisition of real property and the furnishing of relocation assistance. Any contract between a public agency or political subdivision entered into with the authority pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter shall be binding upon said public agency or political subdivision according to its terms, and such public agency or political subdivision shall have the power to enter into such contracts as in the discretion of the governing authorities thereof would be to the best interest of the people of such public agency or political subdivision. Such contracts may include within the discretion of such governing authorities a pledge of the full faith and credit of such political subdivision for the performance thereof. If such contracts include a pledge of the full faith and credit of such political subdivision, then for the purposes of Sections 27-39-321 and 37-57-107, the indebtedness created by such contracts shall be deemed to be general obligation bonds. The obligations of any public agency or political subdivision arising under the terms of such contracts shall not be included within the indebtedness of such public agency or political subdivision for the purposes of any constitutional or statutory limitation or provision. If at any time title to or possession of the project or any such facility or enhancement is held by any public body or governmental agency other than the authority, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, any contract entered into between the authority and any political subdivision for the appropriation or payment of funds to the authority under item (a)(ii) of this section shall contain a provision therein requiring monthly payments by the political subdivision to pay its indebtedness and, if the political subdivision is not a county or municipality, such contract shall include as an additional party to the contract the county or municipality (referred to in this paragraph as “levying authority”) that levies and collects taxes for the contracting political subdivision. If the political subdivision fails to pay its indebtedness for any month, the authority shall certify to the State Tax Commission, or other appropriate agency, the amount of the delinquency, and the State Tax Commission shall deduct such amount from the political subdivision’s or levying authority’s, as the case may be, next allocation of sales taxes, petroleum taxes, highway privilege taxes, severance taxes, Tennessee Valley Authority payments in lieu of taxes and homestead exemption reimbursements in that order of priority. The State Tax Commission, or other appropriate agency, shall pay the sums so deducted to the authority to be applied to the discharge of the contractual obligation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-19.
Power of authority to borrow money and issue bonds generally.

Upon notification to the authority by the United States Department of Energy that the state has been finally selected as the site for the project, then the authority shall have the power and is hereby authorized, from time to time, pursuant to contracts entered into under Section 57-67-17, to borrow money and to issue bonds in such principal amounts as the authority may determine to be necessary to provide funds sufficient to defray all or any designated portion of the costs incurred with respect to the project or any facility related to the project, or any educational, cultural, housing or recreational facility or enhancement offered to secure the siting of the project in the state; provided that prior to said notification, the authority may enter into agreements with the United States Government or others that will commit the authority to issue bonds for eligible undertakings set out in subsection (6) of this section pursuant to contracts entered into under Section 57-67-17, conditioned on the siting of the project in the state.

Bonds of the authority issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 shall be payable (except to the extent that payment may be made from bond proceeds deposited or accumulated in any capitalized interest fund or bond reserve fund) solely from and secured by a pledge of all or any designated part of the revenues received by the authority pursuant to contracts entered into with one or more public agencies pursuant to Section 57-67-17. Such bonds may be further secured by a trust indenture between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state, and by reserves established to secure the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds. Any pledge of earnings, revenues or other moneys made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The earnings, revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the authority whether such parties have or do not have notice thereof. Neither the bond resolution, trust indenture nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Bonds of the authority issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 may be authorized and issued in one or more series by a resolution or resolutions of the authority, without publication of notice of intent and without an election on the question of the issuance thereof. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, carry such conversion privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner and by such officers, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state, be subject to such terms of redemption prior to maturity, all as may be provided by resolution or resolutions of the authority. Such bonds may be executed and delivered at any time as a single issue or from time to time as several issues, and may mature or become payable in such amounts and at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, all as may be provided by resolution or resolutions of the authority.

Bonds of the authority issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 may be sold at a price not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value plus accrued interest, at public or private sale, at such times as may be determined by the authority to be in the public interest, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.

Whenever any bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 shall have been signed by the officer(s) designated by the resolution of the authority to sign the bonds, who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officer(s) prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the manual or facsimile signatures of such officer(s) upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially executing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 may be applied for the purposes of (a) defraying all or any designated portion of the costs incurred with respect to the project or any facility related to the project, or any educational, cultural, housing or recreational facility offered as an enhancement to secure the siting of the project in the state, including costs of design and engineering, all costs incurred to provide land, easements, rights-of-way and relocation costs with respect to the project and with respect to any such facility; (b) providing for the payment of interest on the bonds; (c) providing debt service reserves; and (d) paying underwriters discount, original issue discount, accountants’ fees, engineers’ fees, attorney’s fees, rating agency fees and other fees and expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds and other necessary and proper expenses of the authority in connection with the project or any such facility. Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 may be invested, subject to federal limitations, pending their use, in such securities as may be specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earning on such investment applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

Neither the executive director of the authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds under Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31, the authority is hereby authorized to negotiate and enter into any loan or credit agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution for the purpose of making any payments authorized under this chapter. All borrowings made under this provision shall be evidenced by notes of the authority which shall be issued from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding the amount of bonds authorized herein, in such form and in such denomination and subject to such terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest, and time of payment of interest as the authority shall agree to in such agreement. Such notes may also be issued for the purpose of refunding previously issued notes; provided that no notes shall mature more than three (3) years following the date of issuance of the first note hereunder and provided further, that all outstanding notes shall be retired from the proceeds of the first issuance of bonds hereunder. The authority is authorized to provide for the compensation of any purchaser of the notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission and for all other costs and expenses of issuance and service, including paying agent costs. Such costs and expenses may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-21.
Power of authority to issue refunding bonds.

The authority may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. Refunding bonds may be issued at such time prior to the maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds as the authority deems to be in the public interest, without notice and without an election on the question of the issuance thereof. The refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of such bonds, the expenses of issue of the refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses from the proceeds of such refunding bonds as may be required by the resolution, trust indenture or other security instruments. The issue of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders and the rights, duties and obligations of the authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable. Any such refunding may be effected, whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations proposed to be refunded thereby, and regardless of whether the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-23.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds (other than state bonds, refunding bonds, interim notes and certificates of indebtedness, which may be validated) issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 shall be validated as provided in Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972; provided, however, that notice of such validation proceedings shall be addressed to the taxpayers of all public agencies and political subdivisions:

Which have contracted with the authority pursuant to Section 57-67-17; and

Whose contracts and the payments to be made thereunder constitute security for the bonds of the authority proposed to be issued, and such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper or newspapers having a general circulation within the geographical boundaries of each public agency or political subdivision to whose taxpayers the notice is addressed. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the First Judicial District of the Chancery Court of Hinds County. The validity of the bonds so validated and of the contracts and payments to be made by the political subdivisions thereunder constituting security for the bonds shall be forever conclusive against the authority and the political subdivisions which are parties to said contracts; and the validity of said bonds and said contracts and the payments to be made thereunder shall never be called in question in any court in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-25.
Liability for payment of bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-67-19 through 57-67-31 shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the contracting public agency or political subdivisions, within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, nor shall such bonds constitute a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or the contracting public agency or political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely from the revenues, moneys and funds of the authority pledged therefor. Each bond shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from those sources above mentioned and pledged therefor and that neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-27.
Security for payment of bonds.

The authority may, in any authorizing resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument relating to its bonds, provide for the appointment of a trustee who shall have such powers as are provided therein to represent the registered owners of any issue of bonds in the enforcement or protection of their rights under any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument. The authority may also provide in such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument that the trustee, or in the event that the trustee so appointed shall fail or decline to so protect and enforce such registered owners’ rights then such percentage of registered owners as shall be set forth in, and subject to the provisions of, such resolution, trust indenture or other security interest, may petition the court of proper jurisdiction for the appointment of a receiver of the revenues which are pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds of such registered owners. Such receiver may exercise any power as may be granted in any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument to collect, enforce and receive all revenues derived from agreements with any public agency or political subdivisions entered pursuant to Section 57-67-17, and carry out the contracts and obligations of the authority in the same manner as the authority itself might do, all under the direction of such court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-29.
Specific powers of authority in connection with bonds.

The authority shall have power in connection with the issuance of bonds other that state bonds issued pursuant to this chapter to:

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal.

Redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of the registered owners of the bonds.

Covenant as to the mortgage or pledge of or the grant of a security interest in all or any part of the revenues derived from any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any public agency or political subdivision to secure the payment of bonds, subject to such agreements with the registered owners of bonds as may then exist.

Covenant as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any revenues to which the authority may have any rights or interest, which are pledged as security for the bonds.

Covenant as to the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of any bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and the pledge of such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds.

Covenant as to the limitations on the issuance of any additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

Covenant as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien or security.

Covenant as to the procedure by which the terms of any contract with or for the benefit of the registered owners of bonds may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the registered owners of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds.

Covenant as to the vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine.

Covenant as to the appointing and providing for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents, a bond registrar and transfer agent or other fiduciaries, all of which may be domiciled within or outside the state.

Make all other covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the authority tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provisions for security thereof which are not inconsistent with the Constitution of the state.

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, as any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-31.
Obligations of state in connection with bonds.

The state hereby covenants with the registered owners of bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter, that so long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid the state will not materially limit or materially alter the rights and powers of the authority under this chapter to conduct the activities referred to herein in any way pertinent to the interests of the bondholders including without limitation the authority’s right to collect revenues and to fulfill the terms of any covenants made with the registered owners of the bonds, or in any other way materially impair the rights and remedies of the registered owners of the bonds, unless provision for full payment of such bonds, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or the resolution, trust indenture or security instrument securing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-33.
Taxation of bonds.

Any bonds or state bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, a transaction relating to the sale or securing of such bonds, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-35.
Bonds as legal investments and securities.

All bonds or state bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees, other fiduciaries, savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-37.
Minority small business concerns.

The authority shall expend not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total amounts expended by the authority on planning, construction, training, research, development, testing, evaluation, personal services, procurement, and for the operation and maintenance of any facilities or activities controlled by such authority, with minority small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. For the purpose of determining the total amounts expended with such minority small business concerns, credit shall be given for that portion of any prime contract entered into with the authority which inures to the benefit of such minority small business concern as a subcontractor thereunder.

For the purposes of this section, the term “socially and economically disadvantaged individuals” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C.S., Section 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

For the purposes of this section, the term “minority small business concern” means any small business concern:

Which is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; or, in the case of any publicly owned businesses, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; and

Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of such individuals.

For the purposes of this section, the term “small business concern” shall mean “small business” as the latter term is defined in Section 57-10-155, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In order to comply in a timely manner with its minority small business participation mandate, the authority shall set an annual goal to expend not less than fifteen percent (15%) of its aggregate yearly expenditures with minority small business concerns.

The authority shall:

Monitor the minority small business concerns assistance programs prescribed in this section.

Review and determine the business capabilities of minority small business concerns.

Establish standards for a certification procedure for minority small business concerns seeking to do business with the authority.

Provide technical assistance services to minority small business concerns. Such technical assistance shall include but not be limited to:

Research;

Assistance in obtaining bonds;

Bid preparation;

Certification of business concerns;

Marketing assistance; and

Joint venture and capital development.

Develop alternative bidding and contracting procedures for minority small business concerns in conjunction with the State Fiscal Management Board and the Governor’s Office of General Services.

Utilize such alternative bidding and contracting procedures in lieu of those prescribed in Title 31, Chapters 5 and 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, when contracting with minority small business concerns that have qualified to bid for contracts and have satisfied any other disclosure provisions required by the authority.

Be authorized to accept in lieu of any bond otherwise required from minority small business concerns or small business concerns contracting with the authority, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the total cost of the contracted project, any combination of the following:

Cash;

Certificates of deposit from any bank or banking corporation insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation;

Federal treasury bills;

Letters of credit issued by a bank as that term is defined in Section 81-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

Surety bonds issued by an insurance company licensed and qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi.

Be authorized, in its discretion, to waive any bond required on any project which does not exceed a total dollar value of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). A retainage shall be held by the authority in an amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) from each draw according to American Institute of Architects (AIA) standards. Upon satisfactory completion of such project, ten percent (10%) of the total cost of the contract shall be held in an interest-bearing escrow account for one (1) year. Funds deposited in such escrow account shall stand as a surety for any defects in workmanship or materials detected within twelve (12) months of completion. The balance of all monies so escrowed including accrued interest shall be paid to the contractor at the end of such twelve-month period.

Be empowered to provide an incentive of bimonthly payments to any prime contractors utilizing minority small business concerns as subcontractors on twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the total dollar value of any single project or contract.

Submit an annual report on its progress concerning minority small business contracts to the Legislature by January 30 of each year.

Take all steps necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

The Governor shall create an Office of Minority Small Business Development within the authority. The Office of Minority Small Business Development shall be the primary provider of technical assistance to minority small business concerns. The authority may, in its discretion, contract with minority small business concerns and small business concerns to provide technical assistance under the provisions of this section. The authority may annually expend not more than one percent (1%) of the total dollar amount prescribed in subsection (2) of this section for the purpose of providing technical assistance. All funds expended for technical assistance shall be administrative funds or any funds available other than the amounts prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The authority shall assist in facilitating the entry of minorities into the subject areas of engineering, high-energy physics, mathematics and computer science. An historically Black public institution of higher learning may receive funding from the authority for the enhancement of curriculum in any of these areas for minority student development on the undergraduate and graduate levels.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).

§ 57-67-39.
Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter are cumulative of other statutes now or hereafter enacted relating to the authority, and the authority may exercise all presently held powers in the furtherance of this chapter. If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of the provisions of this chapter is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses and phrases shall in no manner be affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987 Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved August 29, 1987).